Tennessee, session 114, SB2612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-27-114, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
A polygraph examiner or company licensed under this chapter shall notify the
commission in writing within twenty-one (21) days of any change of business address.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2612
012774
- 1 -